Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-26] Rules; policies, standards, and
procedures. (a) The board may adopt rules for the purposes of this
chapter. Rules shall be adopted without regard to chapter 91. Rulemaking
procedures shall be adopted by the board and shall minimally provide for:

(1) Consultation with employers and affected employee
organizations with regard to proposed rules;

(2) Adoption of rules at open meetings that permit
the attendance of any interested persons;

(3) Approval of rules by the governor; and

(4) Filing of rules with the lieutenant governor.

(b) The board may also issue policies,
standards, and procedures consistent with its rules.

(c) The board may adopt rules, without regard
to chapter 91, governing dispute resolution procedures in the event of impasse
in decision-making; provided that the rules shall be adopted with the
concurrence of six trustees. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next